Wyoming, session 2025, HB0064.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 35-6-201 and 35-6-202 are created to
read:
ARTICLE 2
REGULATION OF ABORTIONS
35-6-201. Chemical abortions; ultrasound requirement;
definitions; penalties.
(a) As used in this article:
(i) "Abortion" means the act of using or
prescribing any instrument, medicine, drug or any other
substance, device or means with the intent to terminate the
pregnancy of a woman, including the elimination of one (1)
or more unborn babies in a multifetal pregnancy, with
knowledge that the termination by those means will, with
reasonable likelihood, cause the death of the unborn baby.
"Abortion" shall not include any use, prescription or means
specified in this paragraph if the use, prescription or
means are done with the intent to:
(A) Save the life or preserve the health of
the unborn baby;
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0064
ENROLLED ACT NO. 35, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(B) Remove a dead unborn baby caused by
spontaneous abortion or intrauterine fetal demise;
(C) Treat a woman for an ectopic pregnancy;
or
(D) Treat a woman for cancer or another
disease that requires medical treatment which treatment may
be fatal or harmful to the unborn baby.
(ii) "Chemical abortion" means the use of any
medication, drug, substance or combination thereof that is
prescribed or administered for the purpose of terminating a
pregnancy once the pregnancy can be confirmed through
conventional medical testing;
(iii) "Health care provider" means a person
licensed, certified or authorized in a health care
profession under title 33 of the Wyoming statutes;
(iv) "Pregnancy" or "pregnant" means the human
female reproductive condition of having a living unborn
baby or human being within a human female's body throughout
the entire embryonic and fetal stages of the unborn baby or
human being from fertilization, when a fertilized egg has
implanted in the wall of the uterus, to full gestation and
childbirth.
(b) Not less than forty-eight (48) hours before a
pregnant woman procures the drugs or substances for a
chemical abortion or before a health care provider
dispenses the drugs or substances necessary for a chemical
abortion, whichever is earlier, the pregnant woman shall
receive an ultrasound in order to provide the pregnant
woman the opportunity to view the active ultrasound of the
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0064
ENROLLED ACT NO. 35, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
unborn baby and view the fetal heart motion or hear the
heartbeat of the unborn baby if the heartbeat is audible.
(c) The ultrasound required under subsection (b) of
this section shall be of a quality consistent with standard
medical practice in the community.
(d) Upon providing an ultrasound under this section,
the provider of the ultrasound shall provide the pregnant
woman with a document that specifies:
(i) The date, time and place of the ultrasound;
(ii) The health care provider who ordered or
requested the ultrasound;
(iii) The health care provider who performed the
ultrasound;
(iv) Confirmation of intrauterine pregnancy and
the gestational age of the unborn baby.
(e) Before a health care provider dispenses the drugs
or substances necessary for a chemical abortion to a
pregnant woman, the health care provider shall verify that
the ultrasound required by this section occurred.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than
six (6) months, a fine not to exceed nine thousand dollars
($9,000.00), or both. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to subject a pregnant woman to any criminal
penalty under this subsection.
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0064
ENROLLED ACT NO. 35, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
35-6-202. Ultrasound requirement; conflict of laws;
applicability.
If any provision of this article conflicts with the Life is
a Human Right Act or W.S. 35-6-139, the provisions of the
Life is a Human Right Act and W.S. 35-6-139 shall control
over this article to the extent that the Life is a Human
Right Act and W.S. 35-6-139 are enforceable.
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0064
ENROLLED ACT NO. 35, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
5